Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26 Criminal Detention Facilities Standards
A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2016, No. 266, § 36, provided: “MARKETING AND REDISTRIBUTION PROCEEDS FROM SALE OF STATE PROPERTY. The proceeds from the sale of state property through the Marketing and Redistribution Section of the Department of Finance and Administration, may be deposited into the Cash in State Treasury fund in an amount not to exceed $100,000 there to be used for operating expenses for the Paws in Prison program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “division” for “department” throughout (a).

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, codified as §§12-27-101 —12-27-105,12-27-107 —12-27-109,12-27-112,12-27-113,12-27-115,12-27-118,12-27-120,12-28-102,12-29-101 —12-29-104,12-29-107,12-29-112,12-29-401,12-30-301,12-30-306,12-30-401,12-30-403,12-30-405 —12-30-407,12-30-408 [repealed],16-93-101,16-93-102,16-93-201 [repealed],16-93-202 —16-93-204,16-93-601,16-93-610,16-93-701,16-93-705.

Inmate who asserted wool blankets caused him to suffer rashes did not show a serious medical need that would have supported a claim of a violation of Ark. Const. Art. 2, § 9 or §16-123-105 of the Arkansas Civil Rights Act; the inmate's condition was not one that mandated treatment even though it may have been diagnosed by a doctor and, while the evidence showed he indeed suffered from discomfort and rashes, he had been provided with adequate treatment for those symptoms. Williams v. Ark. Dep't of Corr., 362 Ark. 134, 207 S.W.3d 519, cert. denied, 546 U.S. 1018, 126 S. Ct. 647, 163 L. Ed. 2d 531 (2005).

Cited: Edens v. State, 258 Ark. 734, 528 S.W.2d 416 (1975).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a) and (b); and “division” for “department” in (b).

The Division of Correction shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the care, charge, custody, control, management, administration, and supervision of all persons and offenders committed to, or in the custody of, the state penitentiary;

The Division of Correction shall maintain management and control over all properties, both real and personal, facilities, books, records, equipment, supplies, materials, contracts, funds, moneys, equities, and all other properties belonging to the state penitentiary, except those deemed by the Board of Corrections to be placed in the Division of Community Correction. The Division of Correction shall administer said properties in accordance with the provisions of this act and other laws applicable to the administration of the state correctional system;

The Department of Correction, as the Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019, assumed all obligations, contracts, indebtedness, liabilities, and other obligations of the state penitentiary system existing on March 1, 1968;

The Department of Correction, as the Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019, has custody, management, and control over all institutions and facilities, and the inmates therein, belonging to the state penitentiary or hereafter established by the Department of Correction, as the Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019, and known as the Division of Correction for the custodial correction and rehabilitation of persons committed to the Division of Correction for its care, except for those institutions established by or transferred to the Division of Community Correction.

Legal custody of inmates transferred to the Division of Community Correction shall remain with the Division of Correction unless altered by court order;

The Division of Correction shall establish and operate classification committees, diagnosis and treatment programs, and such other programs as may be desirable to fulfill the purposes of this act;

The Division of Correction shall employ such officers, employees, and agents and shall secure such offices and quarters as are deemed necessary to discharge the functions of the Division of Correction;

The Division of Correction shall receive all offenders committed to the Division of Correction for conviction of felonies or other offenses, the punishment of which is commitment to the penitentiary under the laws of this state, and shall be responsible for the care, custody, and correction of such persons pursuant to policies established by the Board of Corrections;

The Division of Correction shall operate all farming, livestock, industries, and other income-producing facilities of the Division of Correction and shall sell the products of its industries and farms in the manner provided by law;

The Division of Correction may establish and operate regional adult detention facilities, provided funds therefor have been authorized and appropriated by the General Assembly;

The Division of Correction shall cooperate with municipalities and counties in this state in providing consulting services when requested with respect to detention and correctional facilities operated by the municipalities or counties;

The Division of Correction shall cooperate with law enforcement agencies of this state, the United States, institutions of this state for the detention, custody, and care of delinquent and dependent juveniles, and with all agencies and departments of this state offering services or programs of welfare, rehabilitation, and other services for the benefit of persons committed to the Division of Correction;

The Division of Correction may accept gifts, grants, and funds from public and private sources with prior approval of the Board of Corrections and administer the same in furtherance of the purposes of this act;

The Division of Correction shall have the authority to issue warrants for the retaking of any person who, committed to its custody, unlawfully escapes therefrom.

The warrant shall:

Authorize all law enforcement officials of this state to take custody and return the person named therein to the custody of the Division of Correction; and

Authorize all law enforcement officials of this state, any other state, and the federal government to take custody and detain the person in any suitable detention facility while awaiting further transfer to the Division of Correction;

Subject to the approval of the Governor, the Division of Correction may cooperate with and contract with the federal government, governmental agencies of Arkansas and other states, political subdivisions of Arkansas, political subdivisions of other states, counties, regional correctional facilities, and private contractors to provide and improve correctional operations and to keep custody of inmates transferred from the Division of Correction.

A facility owned or leased under this subdivision (b)(14) shall comply with all constitutional standards of the United States and the State of Arkansas.

A county may contract for construction or operation or both with another entity to house a Division of Correction inmate under this subdivision (b)(14) for a period not to exceed twenty (20) years;

The Division of Correction shall cooperate with the Division of Community Correction, the Parole Board, the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, judicial districts, municipalities, and counties in this state in providing guidance and services required to ensure a full range of correctional options for the state as a whole;

The Division of Correction shall provide support to the Division of Community Correction as determined by the Board of Corrections;

The Division of Correction shall assist the Board of Corrections in the furtherance of its goals by staffing the specific charges articulated for it through legislation and by the Board of Corrections; and

The Department of Corrections shall establish programs of research, evaluation, statistics, audit, and planning, including studies and evaluation of the performance of various functions and activities of the department and studies affecting the treatment of offenders and information about other programs.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 3 transferred the powers and duties of the State Penitentiary to the Department of Correction.

Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 21, provided:

“ADC SEX OFFENDER ASSESSMENT. The Arkansas Department of Correction is authorized to enter into a cooperative agreement with a qualified state treatment and assessment agency to conduct assessments of juvenile sex or child offenders as required by provisions of ACA12-12-901 et. seq. and pay for services upon receipt of invoice.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 35, provided:

“ESSENTIAL SERVICES STIPEND. The Arkansas Department of Correction (ADC) may award additional compensation to those exempt employees who are members of the emergency response unit. These employees are eligible to receive up to 3% per hour additional compensation for the actual number of hours that an employee spends on an emergency response action.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2015, No. 1206, § 2, provided:

“(a)The Board of Correction or Department of Correction shall promulgate rules consistent with the implementation of this act and shall submit the rules to the appropriate legislative committee by October 1, 2015.

“(b)Any administrative directive resulting from the implementation of this act shall be reported to the Legislative Council for review at the next scheduled Legislative Council meeting date.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 21, provided: “ADC SEX OFFENDER ASSESSMENT. The Arkansas Department of Correction is authorized to enter into a cooperative agreement with a qualified state treatment and assessment agency to conduct assessments of juvenile sex or child offenders as required by provisions of ACA12-12-901 et. seq. and pay for services upon receipt of invoice.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 35, provided: “ESSENTIAL SERVICES STIPEND. The Arkansas Department of Correction (ADC) may award additional compensation to those exempt employees who are members of the emergency response unit. These employees are eligible to receive up to 3% per hour additional compensation for the actual number of hours that an employee spends on an emergency response action.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “political subdivisions of other states” in (b)(14).

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (b)(14) as (b)(14)(A)(i), and in that subdivision, added “Subject to the approval of the Governor”, inserted “counties, regional correctional facilities”, and added “and to keep custody of inmates transferred from the Department of Correction”; and added (b)(14)(A)(ii) and (b)(14)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “policies and rules” for “policies, rules, and regulations” in the introductory language of (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in the section heading and throughout the section, except for (b)(18) in which “Department of Corrections” was substituted for “Department of Correction”; in (b)(2), substituted “maintain” for “assume”; inserted “as the Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019” in (b)(3); rewrote (b)(4)(A); substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (b)(4)(B), (b)(15), and (b)(16); and made stylistic changes.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §12-27-101.

Cross References. Parole Board, §16-93-201 et seq.

Trial court had no authority to grant prisoner's petition that time served prior to escape be credited on his sentence, since when a valid sentence has been put into execution, Department of Correction has responsibility for prior administration. Charles v. State, 256 Ark. 690, 510 S.W.2d 68 (1974).

The exclusive jurisdiction of custody, control, and supervision of all persons in the penitentiary is vested with the Department of Correction and a trial court cannot intervene in the administration of prison affairs. Stevens v. State, 262 Ark. 216, 555 S.W.2d 229 (1977).

Cited: Eldridge v. Board of Corr., 298 Ark. 467, 768 S.W.2d 534 (1989); Lanford v. State, 33 Ark. App. 11, 800 S.W.2d 434 (1990).

However, a member shall receive a per diem stipend and reimbursement for expenses for both official meetings and related activities associated with attending to the business of the Board of Corrections, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, and the Corrections School System for up to an annual average of seven (7) days per month.

The reimbursement for use of private airplanes shall be in accordance with state travel rules.

A public university employee or other state employee who serves on the Board of Corrections is allowed to receive a per diem stipend and reimbursement of expenses for both official meetings and related activities associated with attending to the business of the Board of Corrections.

All expenses that may be reimbursed to members of the Board of Corrections and stipends as provided in §25-16-901 et seq. shall be payable from the maintenance funds appropriated for the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction.

The Governor shall appoint an advisory judicial group to facilitate coordination among the judicial system, the Division of Correction, and the Division of Community Correction to promote the effective and efficient use of correctional resources in furtherance of sentencing policy adopted by the General Assembly.

The Board of Corrections, in cooperation with the Governor, may establish additional advisory groups composed of professionals from the criminal justice system and citizens representing specific criminal justice interest groups to assist the Board of Corrections in its charge.

The Board of Corrections shall meet no less than quarterly.

The Board of Corrections shall submit to the Governor and the General Assembly a biennial report six (6) months prior to the convening of the regular session.

The Board of Corrections shall keep regular minutes of all its meetings, visits, and proceedings and shall cause the minutes, together with all orders and rules adopted by it, to be recorded in a book which shall be kept by the secretary of the Board of Corrections for that purpose.

The record shall be signed by the members of the Board of Corrections present at the meeting or visit and shall at all times be open to the inspection of the Governor or any member of the General Assembly.

The Board of Corrections shall employ necessary staff to assist with the range and diversity of the charge of the Board of Corrections.

In addition to Board of Corrections staff, the Board of Corrections may reassign staff from the divisions it governs for either short-term or long-term service to the Board of Corrections.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 323, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent. The General Assembly, in Act 549 of 1993, established the Arkansas Department of Community Punishment and delineated its purposes. Confusion in the public's perception, with regard to the purposes of the department, exists and will persist because of the inconsistency between the name of the department and its established purposes. The purpose of this act is to provide the department with a name that more accurately describes its role as an agency that is intended to fulfill the legislatively established purposes of supervision, treatment, rehabilitation, and restoration of adult offenders as useful law-abiding citizens within the community and to provide its supervisory board with a name consistent with the department's name change.”

Acts 2001, No. 323, § 3, provided:

“The ‘Board of Correction and Community Punishment’, as established in Arkansas Code 12-27-104 and 16-93-1203, shall hereafter be known as the ‘Board of Corrections’.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 549, § 3 provided in part that the Board of Correction and the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission shall merge to become the Board of Correction and Community Punishment. Initial appointments to the merged board shall be from the existing Board of Correction, Board of Parole and Community Rehabilitation and Arkansas Adult Probation Commission, except in the case of the criminal justice faculty member who shall be chosen at large. Members of the merged board shall serve a term of seven years, and vacancies which occur after the initial merger shall be filled by gubernatorial appointment. The initial terms of the six (6) members of the board, not determined by virtue of their office, are to be staggered with one member serving until December 31, 1995, one member serving until December 31, 1996, one member serving until December 31, 1997, one member serving until December 31, 1998, one member serving until December 31, 1999, and one member serving until December 31, 2000. The Board shall be impaneled by July 1, 1993, and shall assume power on July 1, 1993, and shall hold its initial meeting within forty-five (45) days of August 13, 1993.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment by No. 958 rewrote (d)(1)(B), substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(1)(C), inserted (d)(1)(D), and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2009 amendment by No. 962 substituted “regular” for “next regularly scheduled legislative.”

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b); and substituted “orders and rules” for “orders, rules, and regulations” in (i)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (d) and (e); and substituted “the charge of the Board of Corrections” for “its charge” in (j)(1), and substituted “divisions” for “departments” in (j)(2).

The board is an agency of the state and as such is not amenable to suits in the state courts. Pitcock v. State, 91 Ark. 527, 121 S.W. 742 (1909) (decision under prior law).

A suit against the board to reform a contract for the purchase of a state convict farm is in effect a suit against the state. Jobe v. Urquhart, 98 Ark. 525, 136 S.W. 663 (1911) (decision under prior law).

No provision of this act shall abridge, diminish, or curtail in any respect the authority vested in the Board of Corrections as the successor to the State Penitentiary Board and the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission to govern and supervise the administration of the state penal institutions and community correction options;

To coordinate resources for the corrections system, in conjunction with sentencing policy developed by the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, in a fashion that best serves the needs of the state, the entities encompassed, and the individuals served by and affected by corrections;

To review and approve budgets submitted by the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction prior to submission for executive and legislative approval;

To develop and approve policy and management decisions for the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction, evaluating their impact on corrections as a whole;

To assist in the development of impact statements and recommendations on all existing and proposed legislation with regard to its effect on corrections as a whole, in cooperation and coordination with the commission;

To coordinate the implementation and continued utilization of community correction options in support of sentencing policies developed by the commission;

To investigate, monitor, and address the needs of the state for adequate housing, treatment, and employment of individuals involved in state-funded correctional programs, facilities, and states of supervision;

To establish programs of research, statistics, and planning, including studies and evaluation of the performance of the various functions and activities of the board, in cooperation and coordination with the commission;

Appoint temporary or permanent advisory committees for such purposes as it may determine;

Authorized and empowered to investigate, consider, and determine the needs of the state for adequately housing, treating, and employing prisoners of the state and to provide adequate facilities for such housing, treatment, and employment.

The Board of Corrections is authorized and empowered to obtain and approve plans and specifications for the necessary buildings and plants to meet such needs and to provide for the construction and equipment of such buildings and plants;

By and with the advice and approval of the Governor, at its discretion to close the operation of any penal institution if it deems such action necessary and more economical;

To establish minimum standards for supervision, contact, programming, housing, and employee hiring within the parameters of those divisions encompassed under its control;

To establish a code of ethics for all employees, both institutional and community correction;

To require and review annual audits of appropriate programs and facilities associated with the Board of Corrections;

To prescribe the duties of all personnel of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction and the rules governing the transfer of employees within each division and between divisions;

Authorized to review, approve, make application for, and accept grants, gifts, and funds from any entity on behalf of any entity encompassed within the control of the Board of Corrections in carrying out and completing such projects as may be approved for the enumerated purposes and projects of this section;

Authorized to establish fees to be levied by the courts and paid by probationers during the probationary period.

The Board of Corrections may also establish fees found necessary for participation in any community correction program or service.

The payment of such sanctions and fees may be a condition of probation, parole, post prison transfer, or attached to admission and participation in a community correction program.

The moneys collected shall be deposited into an earmarked account at the state level to be used solely for the continuation and expansion of community correction in this state.

Economic sanction officers are to be authorized by the Division of Community Correction to perform these duties pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the Board of Corrections and in accord with any state statutory accounting requirements; and

To delegate duties to Board of Corrections staff and division staff as necessary and appropriate to fulfill its responsibilities to the state.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment, in (b)(11), substituted “to close” for “may close” and deleted “or prison farm” following “penal institution”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(15).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” throughout (b), and substituted “each division and between divisions” for “each department and between departments” in (b)(15).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §12-27-101.

The board;

The Director of the Division of Correction;

The Director of the Division of Community Correction; and

Staff of the Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction.

The report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall not include information that is confidential under §12-27-137.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1258, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)Amendment 92 to the Arkansas Constitution states in part: ‘The General Assembly may provide by law for the review by a legislative committee of administrative rules promulgated by a state agency before the administrative rules become effective; and that administrative rules promulgated by a state agency shall not become effective until reviewed and approved by the legislative committee charged by law with the review of administrative rules under subdivision (a)(1) of this section’;

“(2)As Amendment 92 does not define the term ‘state agency’, the General Assembly may establish a definition by law as part of its implementation of Amendment 92;

“(3)The General Assembly at this time wishes to exclude the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education from the definition of ‘state agency’ applied to the implementation of Amendment 92; and

“(4)The General Assembly or the Legislative Council reserve the right to amend the definition of ‘state agency’ in the future to include one (1) or all of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section heading; inserted designation (a); and added (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules and laws” for “rules, laws, and regulations” in (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 396 deleted “laws” following “Publication of rules” in the section heading; rewrote (a); and made a stylistic change in (b)(1)(D).

The Director of the Division of Correction, who shall be the executive, administrative, budgetary, and fiscal officer of the Division of Correction, shall be appointed by the Board of Corrections at a salary fixed by the Board of Corrections which shall not exceed the maximum salary for the position established by law.

The director shall be qualified for the position by character, ability, education, training, and successful administrative experience in correctional or related fields.

The director shall serve at the pleasure of the Board of Corrections.

Subject to the rules, policies, and procedures prescribed by the Board of Corrections, the director shall:

The employees so designated have the authority to use blue rotating or flashing emergency lights on Division of Correction vehicles and exercise other law enforcement powers exercised by police and other law enforcement personnel.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1993, No. 911, § 9, provided:

“Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor shall initially appoint the Director of the Department of Correction after which the Board of Correction and Community Punishment shall appoint the Director of the Department with the advice of the Governor.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (d); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” throughout the section; and substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (d)(5).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §12-27-101.

Cross References. Interstate Corrections Compact, §12-49-101 et seq.

Cited: Messimer v. Lockhart, 702 F.2d 729 (8th Cir. 1983).

For authentication of the records, process, and proceedings of the Division of Correction, the Director of the Division of Correction may adopt and keep an official seal for the use of his or her office, and the seal shall receive judicial notice in all of the courts of the state.

All acts, orders, reports, and other records of the division or copies thereof which are entitled to judicial notice shall be certified to by the director with the seal affixed thereto.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “orders” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” twice in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 741, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-1217; Acts 1989, No. 515, § 4; 2017, No. 153, § 6; 2017, No. 250, § 18.